California, session 20252026, SB953.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12810 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:12810. In When determining the violation point count, the following shall apply:(a) A conviction of failure to stop in the event of an accident in violation of Section 20001 or 20002 shall be given a value of two points.(b) A conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 shall be given a value of two points.(c) A conviction of reckless driving shall be given a value of two points.(d) (1) A conviction of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 or subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, or of Section 2800.2 or 2800.3, subdivision (b) of Section 21651, subdivision (b) of Section 22348, subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 23109, Section 23109.1, or Section 31602 of this code, shall be given a value of two points.(2) A violation of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code in which the case was dismissed pursuant to Section 1001.95 of the Penal Code shall be given a value of two points. (3) A conviction of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23140 shall be given a value of two points.(e) A conviction of a violation of Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.3, or 14601.5 shall be given a value of two points.(f) Except as provided in subdivision (i), any other traffic conviction involving the safe operation of a motor vehicle upon the highway shall be given a value of one point.(g) A traffic accident in which the operator is deemed by the department to be responsible shall be given a value of one point.(h) A conviction of a violation of Section 27360 or 27360.5 shall be given a value of one point.(i) (1) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 40001 shall not result in a violation point count being given to the driver if the driver is not the owner of the vehicle.(2) A conviction of a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 12814.6, subdivision (a) of Section 21116, Section 21207.5, 21708, 21710, 21716, 23120, 24800, or 26707 shall not be given a violation point count.(3) A violation of subdivision (d) of Section 21712 shall not result in a violation point count.(4) A violation of Section 23136 shall not result in a violation point count.(5) A violation of Section 38301, 38301.3, 38301.5, 38304.1, or 38504.1 shall not result in a violation point count.(j) A conviction for only one violation arising from one occasion of arrest or citation shall be counted in determining the violation point count for the purposes of this section.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 3.___________________